Utah statutes.
77-36-2.4.   Violation of protective orders -- Mandatory arrest -- Penalties.

(1)  A law enforcement officer shall, without a warrant, arrest an alleged perpetrator whenever there is probable cause to believe that the alleged perpetrator has violated any of the provisions of an ex parte protective order or protective order.

(2) (a)  Intentional or knowing violation of any ex parte protective order or protective order is a class A misdemeanor, in accordance with Section 76-5-108, except where a greater penalty is provided in this chapter, and is a domestic violence offense, pursuant to Section 77-36-1.

(b)  Second or subsequent violations of ex parte protective orders or protective orders carry increased penalties, in accordance with Section 77-36-1.1.

(3)  As used in this section, "ex parte protective order" or "protective order" includes:

(a)  any protective order or ex parte protective order issued under Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 1, Cohabitant Abuse Act;

(b)  any jail release agreement, jail release court order, pretrial protective order, or sentencing protective order issued under Title 77, Chapter 36, Cohabitant Abuse Procedures Act;

(c)  any child protective order or ex parte child protective order issued under Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 2, Child Protective Orders; or

(d)  a foreign protection order enforceable under Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 3, Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.



Amended by Chapter 384, 2010 General Session

